Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2682.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-72-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-72 entitled "Non-Owner
Occupied Property Tax Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-72-5. Exemptions.
(a) This chapter does not supersede any applicable exemption in the general or public laws.
In no case shall this chapter apply to, or any tax therefrom be assessed against, any properties or
buildings that are rented or were rented for a period of more than one hundred eighty-three (183)
days during the prior taxable year and subject to the provisions of chapter 18 of title 34 or any
properties or buildings that are rented or were rented and are subject to tax pursuant to chapter 18
of this title.
(b) The tax in this chapter shall not be assessed against a non-insulated, non-winterized
property:
(1) In which the water supply to the property is disconnected from November 1 through
April 1;
(2) Which is used or occupied by the taxpayer at a minimum of the Saturday before
Memorial Day through Labor Day;
(3) Which is not in a blighted or substandard area as defined in § 45-31-8; and
(4) Which has been owned by the taxpayer or taxpayer’s family for more than twenty-five
(25) years.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005700
========
LC005700 - Page 2 of 3